Louisiana, session 2026, SB163.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Section 3 of Act No. 331 of the 2023 Regular Session of the Legislature
and Section 2 of Act No. 700 of the 2024 Regular Session of the Legislature are hereby
repealed.
Section 2. If any federal law related to the licensure of virtual currency business
activities preempts any provision of Chapter 21 of Title 6 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes
of 1950, known as the Virtual Currency Business Act, then any provision of Louisiana law
authorizing the preempted activity shall be deemed null, void, and without force or effect
to the extent of the conflict with federal law. Such change shall become effective on the last
day of the calendar year in which the federal law becomes effective.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.